bulgarian.aff
flag *Z:
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ã
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÕŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ¿“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈… »
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈À»
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈À»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ã
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÕŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÕŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÿ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÿ≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ»
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ŸŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ŸŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’Ã≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’Ã≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,∆
    Ã        >      -Ã,∆“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,À
    Ã        >      -Ã,À¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,À¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ÀŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,…“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
